Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202653-124.11
Special designated license; issuance; procedure; fee.

(1) The commission may issue a special designated license for sale or consumption of alcoholic liquor at a designated location to a retail licensee, a craft brewery licensee, a microdistillery licensee, a farm winery licensee, the holder of a manufacturer's license issued pursuant to subsection (2) of section 53-123.01, a municipal corporation, a fine arts museum incorporated as a nonprofit corporation, a religious nonprofit corporation which has been exempted from the payment of federal income taxes, a political organization which has been exempted from the payment of federal income taxes, or any other nonprofit corporation the purpose of which is fraternal, charitable, or public service and which has been exempted from the payment of federal income taxes, under conditions specified in this section. The applicant shall demonstrate meeting the requirements of this subsection.

(2)(a) No retail licensee, craft brewery licensee, microdistillery licensee, farm winery licensee, holder of a manufacturer's license issued pursuant to subsection (2) of section 53-123.01, organization, or corporation enumerated in subsection (1) of this section may be issued a special designated license under this section for more than six calendar days in any one calendar year, except that a nonprofit corporation, the purpose of which is fraternal, charitable, or public service and which has been exempted from the payment of federal income taxes, may be issued a special designated license for up to twelve calendar days in any one calendar year. Only one special designated license shall be required for any application for two or more consecutive days.

(b) A municipal corporation, a fine arts museum incorporated as a nonprofit corporation, a religious nonprofit corporation which has been exempted from the payment of federal income taxes, a political organization which has been exempted from the payment of federal income taxes, or any other nonprofit corporation, the purpose of which is fraternal, charitable, or public service and which has been exempted from the payment of federal income taxes, may apply for special designated licenses for the same location in a single application. The application shall include all dates and times for which a special designated license is being requested at such location.

(c) This subsection shall not apply to any holder of a catering license.

(3) Except for any special designated license issued to a holder of a catering license or to an organization or corporation as provided in subdivision (2)(b) of this section, there shall be a fee of forty dollars for each day identified in the special designated license. For a special designated license issued to an organization or corporation as provided in subdivision (2)(b) of this section, there shall be a fee of forty dollars for the initial special designated license and ten dollars for each additional day beyond the first at the same location in such application. Such fee shall be submitted with the application for the special designated license, collected by the commission, and remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the General Fund. The applicant shall be exempt from the provisions of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act requiring an application or renewal fee and the provisions of the act requiring the expiration of forty-five days from the time the application is received by the commission prior to the issuance of a license, if granted by the commission. The retail licensees, craft brewery licensees, microdistillery licensees, farm winery licensees, holders of manufacturer's licenses issued pursuant to subsection (2) of section 53-123.01, municipal corporations, organizations, and nonprofit corporations enumerated in subsection (1) of this section seeking a special designated license shall file an application on such forms as the commission may prescribe. Such forms shall contain, along with other information as required by the commission, (a) the name of the applicant, (b) the premises for which a special designated license is requested, identified by street and number if practicable and, if not, by some other appropriate description which definitely locates the premises, (c) the name of the owner or lessee of the premises for which the special designated license is requested, (d) sufficient evidence that the holder of the special designated license, if issued, will carry on the activities and business authorized by the license for himself, herself, or itself and not as the agent of any other person, group, organization, or corporation, for profit or not for profit, (e) a statement of the type of activity to be carried on during the time period for which a special designated license is requested, and (f) sufficient evidence that the activity will be supervised by persons or managers who are agents of and directly responsible to the holder of the special designated license.

(4) No special designated license provided for by this section shall be issued by the commission without the approval of the local governing body. The local governing body may establish criteria for approving or denying a special designated license. The local governing body may designate an agent to determine whether a special designated license is to be approved or denied. Such agent shall follow criteria established by the local governing body in making his or her determination. The determination of the agent shall be considered the determination of the local governing body unless otherwise provided by the local governing body. For purposes of this section, the local governing body shall be the city or village within which the premises for which the special designated license is requested are located or, if such premises are not within the corporate limits of a city or village, then the local governing body shall be the county within which the premises for which the special designated license is requested are located.

(5) If the applicant meets the requirements of this section, a special designated license shall be granted and issued by the commission for use by the holder of the special designated license. All statutory provisions and rules and regulations of the commission that apply to a retail licensee shall apply to the holder of a special designated license with the exception of such statutory provisions and rules and regulations of the commission so designated by the commission and stated upon the issued special designated license, except that the commission may not designate exemption of sections 53-180 to 53-180.07. The decision of the commission shall be final. If the applicant does not qualify for a special designated license, the application shall be denied by the commission.

(6) A special designated license issued by the commission shall be mailed or delivered electronically to the city, village, or county clerk who shall deliver such license to the licensee upon receipt of any fee or tax imposed by such city, village, or county.

Laws 1983, LB 213, § 9;

Laws 1988, LB 490, § 5;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 27;

Laws 1994, LB 1292, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 750, § 7;

Laws 2000, LB 973, § 4;

Laws 2006, LB 562, § 4;

Laws 2007, LB549, § 8;

Laws 2010, LB861, § 58;

Laws 2016, LB1105, § 17;

Laws 2019, LB56, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB1236, § 3;

Laws 2023, LB376, § 11.